Wisconsin, session 2025, AB34.
do enact as follows:AB34,14Section 1. 968.02 (3) of the statutes is renumbered 968.02 (3) (a).AB34,21Section 2. 968.02 (3) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB34,2,62968.02 (3) (b) Notwithstanding par. (a), unless there is new or unused 3evidence presented, a circuit court may not permit the filing of a complaint against 4a law enforcement officer who is involved in an officer-involved death, as defined in 5s. 175.47 (1) (c), if a district attorney determines there is no basis to prosecute the 6officer.AB34,37Section 3. 968.26 (2) (d) of the statutes is renumbered 968.26 (2) (d) 1.AB34,48Section 4. 968.26 (2) (d) 2. of the statutes is created to read:AB34,2,129968.26 (2) (d) 2. Notwithstanding subd. 1., unless there is new or unused 10evidence presented, the judge may not issue a complaint against a law enforcement 11officer who is involved in an officer-involved death, as defined in s. 175.47 (1) (c), if 12the district attorney determines there is no basis to prosecute the officer.AB34,513Section 5. Initial applicability.AB34,2,1514(1) This act first applies to determinations made by a district attorney on the 15effective date of this subsection.AB34,2,1616